Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-215
Fugitive to this state; apprehension; surrender to local authorities.

Any such person who shall be captured or arrested by the military forces of such other state while in this state, shall without unnecessary delay be surrendered to the military or police forces of this state to be dealt with according to law.

Laws 1941, c. 116, § 6, p. 449;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 55-406;

R.S.1943, § 55-215.